Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Article 1. Mississippi Brownfields Voluntary Cleanup and Redevelopment Act.

§ 49-35-1.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Brownfields Voluntary Cleanup and Redevelopment Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 528, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-35-3.
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds:

There are properties in Mississippi, often referred to as “brownfields,” that are contaminated or are perceived to be contaminated by past activities, but are potential locations for redevelopment.

Brownfields development and redevelopment is impaired by the potential liability associated with the actual or perceived risk of contamination.

The safe development or redevelopment of brownfields will benefit the citizens of Mississippi in many ways, including improving the tax base of local governments and creating job opportunities for citizens in the vicinity of brownfields.

The reduction of public health and environmental hazards on existing brownfield sites is essential to creating a better quality of life for the citizens of this state.

This article will provide incentives for the voluntary cleanup of brownfield property without use of taxpayer funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 528, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-35-5.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Brownfield agreement” means an agreement between the commission and a brownfield party for the remediation of a brownfield agreement site.

“Brownfield agreement site” means brownfield property that is remediated under a brownfield agreement. The site shall consist of the brownfield property that is the subject of the application and any other brownfield property (i) for which the source of contamination is environmental contamination or activities on or under the brownfield property that is the subject of the application, and (ii) concerning which the commission determines that remediation is necessary.

“Brownfield party” means any person who desires to execute and implement a brownfield agreement, including but not limited to, the record owner of the brownfield agreement site, a person who desires to either buy or sell the brownfield agreement site for the purpose of developing or redeveloping that site and the successors and assigns of these owners and persons, and local governments and other political subdivisions that desire to promote the development or redevelopment of the brownfield agreement site.

“Brownfield property” means any property where use is limited by actual or potential environmental contamination, or the perception of environmental contamination, and that is or may be subject to remediation under any state environmental program or under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, as amended, 42 USCS 9601 et seq. (1997) (CERCLA), but does not include any of the following:

Those sites proposed by the United States Environmental Protection Agency for the National Priorities List (NPL) but not listed on the NPL or those sites listed on the NPL, except those NPL sites for which the United States Environmental Protection Agency has issued certificates of completion of the remediation set forth in the records of decision for those sites;

Those sites for which an order or enforcement action is issued or entered under CERCLA or Sections 3008(h), 3013(a) or 7003(c) of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, as amended, 42 USCS 6901 et seq. (1994 and Supp. 1997) (RCRA) and which is still in effect; and

Those sites undergoing corrective action under RCRA Section 3004(u), 3004(v) or 3008(h), except those sites that the United States Environmental Protection Agency determines have completed corrective action.

“Commission” means the Commission on Environmental Quality.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.

“Engineering control” means a modification to a brownfield agreement site to reduce or eliminate the potential for exposure to contaminants. These modifications may include, but are not limited to, physical or hydraulic control measures, capping, point of use treatment, or slurry walls, but shall not include the exclusive use of security fencing.

“Executive director” means the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality.

“Land-use restriction” means the limitation on use of or access to a brownfield agreement site to reduce or eliminate the potential for exposure to contaminants. These restrictions may include, but are not limited to, deed restrictions, use restrictions, or restrictive zoning.

“Local government” means a county or municipality within the State of Mississippi.

“Person” means person as defined in Section 17-17-3.

“Potentially responsible party” means a person who is or may be liable for remediation under a remedial program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 528, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-35-7.
Application; required information and agreement terms; remediation.

Any brownfield party shall provide the department, in an application as prescribed by the commission, information necessary to demonstrate that:

As a result of the proposed remediation, the brownfield property will be suitable for the use or uses specified in the application while fully protecting public health and the environment;

The brownfield party has or can obtain the financial, managerial, and technical resources to implement fully and complete the proposed remediation and assure the safe use of the brownfield property;

The current owner of the brownfield property that is the subject of the application is an applicant or has given written approval for submission of the application; and

The brownfield party will comply with all applicable procedural requirements.

The commission or the department may require the brownfield party to provide other information that is reasonably related to the application or to the brownfield party.

Within thirty (30) days after submission of the application, the commission shall establish, by order, a written schedule, including time for the identification of other brownfield property (i) for which the source of contamination is environmental contamination or activities on or under the brownfield property that is the subject of the application, and (ii) concerning which the commission determines that remediation is necessary, for the processing of the application by the department.

If brownfield property other than that property which is the subject of the original application is identified, the applicant shall obtain written approval from that brownfield property owner for inclusion of that brownfield property in the brownfield agreement site.

Following the review of the application and any other information available to the department, the department shall prepare a proposed brownfield agreement. In preparation of the agreement, the department shall consult with the applicant brownfield party.

A brownfield agreement shall contain a description of the brownfield agreement site sufficient to serve as a legal description of that site and, as applicable, a statement providing:

A description of all remediation to be conducted on or under the brownfield agreement site, including:

A description of specific areas where remediation is to be conducted;

The remediation method or methods to be employed;

The financial, technical and managerial resources that the brownfield party will make available;

A schedule of remediation activities;

Remediation requirements that are based on public health and environmental risks specific to the brownfield agreement site as established under subsection (6) of this section;

A schedule for implementation and completion of the remediation; and

Any land-use restrictions or engineering controls constituting any part of the remediation required by the commission in the brownfield agreement.

The proposed uses of the brownfield agreement site after all remediation required by the commission is completed.

A schedule for administration of the brownfield agreement by the department.

Requirements, as deemed appropriate by the commission, for reporting on the progress of remediation conducted on or under the brownfield agreement site.

Any other provisions necessary to implement the brownfield agreement.

A brownfield agreement shall establish remediation requirements that are based on public health and environmental risks specific to the brownfield agreement site. In establishing the risk-based remediation requirements in a brownfield agreement, the commission shall consider the use of appropriate land-use restrictions or engineering controls or both proposed by the brownfield party. The commission may determine that permanent engineering controls in conjunction with appropriate land-use restrictions satisfy the remediation required by the commission in the brownfield agreement. These risk-based remediation requirements may include contaminant-specific, state-specific, site-specific and/or likelihood of risk methodologies for the implementation of these risk-based remediation requirements. Any party to a brownfield agreement who complies with the requirements of a brownfield agreement may rely on these risk-based remediation requirements, land-use restrictions and engineering controls as governing the extent of remediation required to be performed by the brownfield party on or under the brownfield agreement site for all purposes of this article, including liability protection, subject to the limitations in Section 49-35-15(5). Any risk-based remediation requirements, land-use restrictions and engineering controls implemented under a brownfield agreement shall be conducted in a cost-effective manner, consistent with projected future uses of the brownfield agreement site.

During the remediation process, the commission may modify a brownfield agreement after appropriate public participation, if the commission receives new information demonstrating that a contaminant on or under the brownfield agreement site poses less risk than the risk that formed a basis for the remediation requirements.

The applicant brownfield party and the commission may agree to remediation of a brownfield property which is not the subject of the application to a risk level of unrestricted use.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 528, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-35-9.
Agreements reached before consideration by commission; public notice; notice to property owners; public hearings.

If the department and a brownfield party reach a proposed agreement, then at least thirty (30) days before the date that the commission considers the proposed brownfield agreement under Section 49-35-11, the department shall publish a public notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the brownfield agreement site is located. The public notice shall (i) describe the proposed brownfield agreement, including the proposed brownfield agreement site; (ii) request public comment on the proposed agreement within thirty (30) days after the date of publication of the notice; and (iii) provide the date and location of the commission’s consideration of the proposed brownfield agreement. A copy of the proposed brownfield agreement shall be filed for public inspection in the county courthouse of the county or counties in which the proposed brownfield agreement site is located.

The commission shall notify in writing the governing authority of the local government in which the proposed site is located.

At the time of publication of the public notice under paragraph (a) of this subsection, an applicant brownfield party shall notify by certified mail, each record owner of property contiguous to the brownfield agreement site identified by the brownfield party after examination of the land records of the county or counties in which the brownfield agreement site is located at the address contained in the county records, if available. No brownfield agreement shall be declared invalid based on failure of any person to receive notice under this subsection.

The commission may by regulation require additional public notice.

The department may conduct a public hearing on the proposed brownfield agreement in the county in which the majority of the proposed brownfield agreement site is located, or in any other location in the local area of the proposed brownfield agreement site that is convenient to the members of the public who may have an interest in the proposed brownfield agreement. The department shall publish a notice of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the proposed brownfield agreement site is located. The department shall provide to the commission for review before its consideration of the proposed brownfield agreement all public comments and the transcript of any public hearing on the proposed brownfield agreement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 528, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-35-11.
Approval and execution of agreements; modifications; changes in surface ownership; powers of executive director.

If the commission finds that the proposed brownfield agreement complies with this article and regulations, the commission, by order, shall approve the proposed brownfield agreement. After approval of the brownfield agreement, the executive director and the brownfield party shall execute the brownfield agreement.

The commission may enter into a brownfield agreement as proposed by the department or may modify that agreement before entering into it. The commission subsequently may modify any brownfield agreement by entry of an order. The commission orders issued under this article shall be reviewable as provided in Section 49-17-41. The commission may disapprove a proposed brownfield agreement or decline to enter into a brownfield agreement by entry of an order. In the order, the commission shall state the reasons for disapproval of the agreement or declining to enter into the agreement.

Until the executive director issues a “no further action” letter under Section 49-35-15, approval from the commission shall be required for any sale, conveyance or other change in surface ownership of any portion of the brownfield agreement site owned by the brownfield party desiring to make the change in ownership, if the new surface owner will perform any obligations under the brownfield agreement. That brownfield party and the new surface owner jointly shall provide information satisfactory to the commission that the new surface owner has the financial, managerial and technical resources to complete performance of the brownfield agreement obligations to be transferred and that the new surface owner agrees to complete this performance. If the commission determines that the new surface owner has the financial, managerial, and technical resources to complete this performance and has agreed to do so, the commission shall issue an order approving the transfer.

Except for orders issued under subsections (1) and (2) of this section and Section 49-35-13(2), the commission, under any conditions it may prescribe, may authorize the executive director to issue any orders required under this article. A decision by the executive director shall be a decision of the commission and shall be reviewable as provided under Section 49-17-41.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 528, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-35-13.
Violations; time period for corrections; penalties.

Any material failure of a brownfield party or the agents or employees of a brownfield party to comply with the brownfield agreement constitutes a violation of this section by the brownfield party. If a brownfield party violates this section the commission shall issue an order requiring the brownfield party to correct the violation in an appropriate time period established by the order.

If the brownfield party fails to comply with an order issued under subsection (1) of this section, the brownfield party shall be subject to removal of all liability protection afforded by the brownfield agreement under Section 49-35-15 and shall be subject to civil penalties under Section 49-17-43.

This section shall not create a defense against the imposition of criminal or civil penalties or other administrative remedies authorized by law for violations of law caused by the brownfield party while implementing or failing to implement the brownfield agreement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 528, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-35-15.
Liability protections; exceptions; additional remediation; conditions; completed performance; order by commission; letter.

Except as provided under subsection (5) of this section and Section 49-35-13(2), a brownfield party who executes a brownfield agreement shall be relieved of liability to all persons other than the United States for: (a) remediation of the brownfield agreement site other than the remediation required by the brownfield agreement; and (b) all costs reasonably related to the remediation other than the remediation and costs required by the brownfield agreement or this article. However, this article shall not affect the right of any person to seek relief against any party to the brownfield agreement who may have liability with respect to a brownfield agreement site, except as provided in this section.

The liability protection provided under this section applies to the following persons to the same extent as to a brownfield party:

Any person under the direction or control of the brownfield party who directs or contracts for remediation or redevelopment of the brownfield agreement site;

Any current owner and any future owner of the brownfield agreement site;

Any person who develops, redevelops or lawfully occupies the brownfield agreement site;

Any successor or assign of any person to whom the liability protection provided under this section applies; and

Any lender or fiduciary that provided financing for remediation or redevelopment of the brownfield agreement site.

A person who conducts an environmental assessment on a brownfield agreement site and who is not otherwise a potentially responsible party shall not become a potentially responsible party as a result of conducting the environmental assessment, unless that person increases the risk of harm to public health or the environment by failing to exercise due diligence and reasonable care in performing the environmental assessment.

The liability protection provided under this section shall become effective upon execution of a brownfield agreement and shall remain effective, unless the commission removes the liability protection under Section 49-35-13(2).

A brownfield party who completes the remediation required under a brownfield agreement and any other person who receives liability protection under this section shall not be required to perform additional remediation on or under the brownfield agreement site unless:

The brownfield party provides to the commission false information or fails to disclose to the commission relevant information about environmental contamination on or under the brownfield agreement site that forms a basis for the brownfield agreement or that is offered to demonstrate compliance with the brownfield agreement;

New information becomes available after execution of the brownfield agreement indicating the existence of previously unknown contaminants or an area of previously unknown environmental contamination that has not been remediated to standards required by applicable federal or state law other than this article. The brownfield agreement may be amended to include remediation of any previously unknown contaminants and any additional areas in the same brownfield agreement site;

The level of risk to public health or the environment resulting from the brownfield agreement site is increased beyond the level that forms a basis for the risk-based remediation requirements in the brownfield agreement due to changes in exposure conditions, including (i) a change in land use at the site or contiguous to the site that increases the probability of exposure to contaminants on or under the brownfield agreement site or (ii) the failure of remediation to mitigate risks to the extent required to make the brownfield agreement site fully protective of public health and the environment as provided in the brownfield agreement;

The department obtains new information after execution of the brownfield agreement about a contaminant on or under the brownfield agreement site that increases the risk to public health or the environment on or under the brownfield agreement site beyond the level that is the basis for the risk-based remediation requirements in the brownfield agreement and in a manner or to a degree not anticipated in the brownfield agreement; or

A brownfield party fails to file a timely and proper notice of brownfield agreement site under Section 49-35-17.

Upon completion of the brownfield agreement, the brownfield party may petition the commission to determine that the performance of the brownfield agreement has been completed. If the commission determines after conducting an inspection of the brownfield agreement site that the brownfield party has completed the brownfield agreement, the commission shall issue an order. Following issuance of an order by the commission, the executive director shall issue a “no further action” letter. The letter shall include the following statement: “Based upon the information provided by (brownfield agreement party) concerning property located at (location), it is the opinion of the Commission on Environmental Quality that (brownfield agreement party) has successfully and satisfactorily implemented and completed the approved brownfield agreement. No further action is required to assure that the remediation required under the brownfield agreement is protective of public health and the environment in accordance with the existing and proposed uses of this property.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 528, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-35-17.
Proposed notice of agreement site; required information; certified copy of agreement and notice to be filed; disclosures; cancellation of notice of agreement site.

A brownfield party entering into a brownfield agreement shall submit to the department for its approval a proposed notice of brownfield agreement site before execution of the brownfield agreement as provided in Section 49-35-11.

A notice of brownfield agreement site (a) shall be entitled “Notice of Brownfield Agreement Site”, (b) shall include a survey plat of the brownfield agreement site described in the brownfield agreement that has been prepared and certified by a professional land surveyor, (c) shall include a legal description of the brownfield agreement site, and (d) shall identify the following:

Within fifteen (15) days after the brownfield agreement is executed, the brownfield party shall file a certified copy of the brownfield agreement and the notice of the brownfield agreement site in the office of the chancery clerk of the county in which the site is located. The chancery clerk shall record and enter the notice of the brownfield agreement site and the brownfield agreement in the land records in accordance with Section 89-5-33 and collect the fees provided in Section 25-7-9. Any deed or other instrument conveying an interest in brownfield property shall state in the deed or instrument that the property is brownfield property and subject to a brownfield agreement, unless the notice is canceled under subsection (4) of this section.

If the notice has not been canceled under subsection (4) of this section, the seller of brownfield property shall disclose in the contract for the purchase of the brownfield property that the property is brownfield property and subject to a brownfield agreement.

If a brownfield party remediates a brownfield agreement site to a risk level of unrestricted use, the brownfield party may petition the commission to cancel the notice of brownfield agreement site. If the commission issues an order canceling the notice, the current owner of the brownfield agreement site shall file a statement issued by the executive director in accordance with the commission’s order canceling the notice in the office of the chancery clerk in any county in which the brownfield agreement site is located. The executive director’s statement shall contain the names of the owners of the brownfield agreement site as shown in the notice of brownfield agreement site and reference the book and page where the notice is recorded. After collecting the proper fee fixed in Section 25-7-9, the chancery clerk shall record the executive director’s statement as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The chancery clerk shall make a marginal entry on the notice of brownfield agreement site showing the date of cancellation and the book and page where the executive director’s statement is recorded, and the chancery clerk shall sign the entry.

The location and dimensions of the areas of potential environmental contamination with respect to permanently surveyed benchmarks;

The type, location, and quantity of contaminants known to exist on or under the brownfield agreement site;

All land-use restrictions on the current or future use of the brownfield agreement site. These land-use restrictions may apply to activities on or under the brownfield agreement site, including, but not limited to, use of groundwater, building, filling, grading, excavating, and mining; and

All engineering controls included in the brownfield agreement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 528, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-35-19.
Enforcement of land-use restrictions or engineering controls.

Any land-use restriction or engineering control in a brownfield agreement and in a notice of brownfield agreement site filed under this section may be enforced by:

Any current owner of the brownfield agreement site;

The commission, by initiating an administrative proceeding or by filing a civil action, without first having exhausted all available administrative remedies;

Any local government having jurisdiction over any part of the brownfield agreement site by filing a civil action, without the local government having first exhausted all available administrative remedies; or

Any person provided liability protection under this article who will lose liability protection if the land-use restriction or engineering control is violated.

Adjacent property owners may enforce any land-use restriction contained in a brownfield agreement or in a notice of brownfield agreement site filed under this section.

A land-use restriction or engineering control shall not be declared unenforceable due to lack of privity of estate or contract, due to lack of benefit to particular land, or due to lack of any property interest in particular brownfield property within the brownfield agreement site. Any person who owns or leases brownfield property within the brownfield agreement site subject to a land-use restriction or engineering control under this section shall abide by the land-use restriction or engineering control.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 528, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-35-21.
Implementation of article; date; promulgation of regulations.

In accordance with Section 49-2-9, the commission shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this article by January 1, 1999. Those regulations may include provisions for determining the eligibility of any person to enter into a brownfield agreement; criteria for inclusion of brownfield property in a brownfield agreement site, including brownfield property under an existing commission agreement or order; requirements for submission of additional information as part of the application or processing of the application and additional requirements for public notice.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 528, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-35-23.
Restrictions on effect of article.

This article shall not:

Affect the authority of local governments to regulate land use under applicable statutes. The use or uses of the brownfield agreement site and any land-use restrictions or engineering controls in the brownfield agreement shall be consistent with local land-use regulations adopted under applicable statutes;

Amend, modify, repeal, or otherwise alter any provision of law available to the commission relating to enforcement of violations of federal or state law within its jurisdiction, including civil and criminal penalties;

Prevent or impede the immediate response of the department or responsible party to an emergency that involves an imminent or actual release of a contaminant that threatens public health or the environment;

Relieve a person receiving liability protection under this section from any liability for environmental contamination later caused or made worse by that person on or under a brownfield agreement site;

Affect the right of any person who may have liability with respect to the brownfield agreement site to seek contribution from any other person who may have liability with respect to the brownfield agreement site and who does not have liability protection under this article;

Prevent the commission from enforcing specific numerical remediation standards, monitoring, or compliance requirements specifically required by the federal government to be enforced as a condition for the department to receive or maintain program authorization, delegation, primacy, or federal funds;

Create a defense against the imposition of criminal and civil penalties or other administrative enforcement remedies authorized by law and imposed as the result of the illegal disposal of solid waste or a regulated substance or for the pollution of the land, air, or waters of this state on or under a brownfield agreement site;

Relieve a person of any liability for failure to exercise due diligence and reasonable care in performing an environmental assessment; or

Create or convey any real or personal property rights, tangible or intangible, to any person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 528, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-35-25.
Payment of costs; Brownfields Cleanup and Redevelopment Trust Fund; collection and use of funds; suspension of activities.

The brownfield party who submits a brownfield agreement application shall pay all reasonable direct and indirect costs of the department associated with the processing of the brownfield agreement application and administration of the brownfield agreement less the advance costs required in subsection (2) of this section.

A brownfield party who submits a brownfield agreement application for review by the department shall pay advance costs of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) at the time the application is submitted to the department.

The commission shall set by order a schedule of costs for the processing of the brownfield agreement applications and the administration of brownfield agreements by the department.

There is created in the State Treasury a fund to be designated as the “Brownfields Cleanup and Redevelopment Trust Fund,” referred to in this section as “fund,” to be administered by the executive director.

Monies in the fund shall be utilized to pay reasonable direct and indirect costs associated with the processing of the brownfield agreement applications and the administration of brownfield agreements.

Expenditures may be made from the fund upon requisition by the executive director.

The fund shall be treated as a special trust fund. Interest earned on the principal shall be credited by the Treasurer to the fund.

The fund may receive monies from any available public or private source, including, but not limited to, collection of costs, interest, grants, taxes, public and private donations, judicial actions and appropriated funds.

Monies in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be retained in the fund for use in the next succeeding fiscal year.

All monies collected under this section shall be deposited into the fund.

The commission may delegate to the department responsibility for the collection of costs in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

All costs under subsection (1) of this section shall be due before a date specified by the department in an invoice which shall be no less than thirty (30) days following the invoice date. If any part of the costs that are imposed is not paid within thirty (30) days after the due date, a penalty of up to twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount due may be imposed and be added to that amount. Any penalty collected under this section shall be deposited into the fund. If the department pursues legal action to collect costs incurred, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs may be assessed against the delinquent party.

Any person required to pay costs under this section who disagrees with the calculation or applicability of the costs may petition the commission for a hearing in accordance with Section 49-17-35. Any hearing shall be in accordance with Section 49-17-33.

Costs collected under this section shall not supplant or reduce in any way the general fund appropriation to the department for the administration of this program.

The department may suspend any activities or actions related to the processing of the brownfield agreement application or administration of a brownfield agreement, if the brownfield party or parties fails to pay any required costs or penalties imposed under this section.

Nothing in this section affects any existing program at the department or affects any authority of the commission or department to take any action authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 528, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 49-35-27.
Periodic report; contents; incentive programs.

Before January 1 of each year, the department shall report to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, Chairman of the Senate Environmental Protection, Conservation and Water Resources Committee and the Chairman of the House Conservation and Water Resources Committee on the status of the implementation of the Mississippi Brownfields Voluntary Cleanup and Redevelopment Program. The report shall include a list of all brownfield parties and brownfield agreement sites participating in the program, a map showing the location of sites, a brief description of the brownfield agreement for each site, including the location of the site, the agreement implementation status of each site and to the extent practicable, information on the redevelopment or reuse of each site. The report annually shall highlight those sites included in the program since the last annual report. If determined more practicable, the department may include the contents of this report in its annual report.

Before January 1, 1999, the department shall conduct a survey of incentive programs in other states for cleanup of contaminated sites. Based on the survey, the department shall make recommendations regarding programs which it believes would be beneficial to encourage the cleanup of uncontrolled sites in this state. The department shall include the results of its survey and its recommendations in the report required under subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 528, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1998.